District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
25 act may be cited as the "Poker and Blackjack Gaming Authorization Act of 2025".
26 Sec. 2. The Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for
27 Charitable Purposes in the District of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-172;
28 D.C. Official Code passim), is amended as follows:
29 (a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code§ 22-1716) is amended by striking the phrase "and
30 sports wagering" and insert the phrase "sports wagering, poker, and blackjack" in its place.
31 (b) Section 3 (D. C. Official Code § 22-1717) is amended by striking the phrase "game of
32 skill machines" and inserting the phrase "game of skill machines, poker, and blackjack" in its
33 place.
34 (c) A new title Vis added to read as follows:
35 "TITLE V. CARD GAMING; POKER AND BLACKJACK.

36 “Sec. 501 Definitions.
37 “For the purposes of this title the term:
38 “(1) “ABCA” means the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration.
39 “(2) “ABC Board” means the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board.
40 “(3) “Authorized establishment” means an eligible establishment where a card
41 gaming facility is authorized to operate under this title.
42 “(4) “Blackjack gross gaming revenue” means the total amount wagered by
43 players on blackjack, including any variations thereof, less total winnings paid out to players, not
44 including promotions, credits or other noncash items.
45 “(5)(A) “Card game” means blackjack or poker, including any authorized
46 variations of blackjack or poker, played in a physical location with physical cards.
47 “(B) The term “card game” does not include blackjack, poker, or any other
48 card game played online or, virtually or in any manner where the outcome is determined by an
49 electronic or other device.
50 “(6) “Card gaming” means wagering on a card game played at a physical location
51 with physical cards.
52 “(7) “Card gaming facility” means a location where wagering on card games is
53 authorized under this title.
54 “(8) “Card gaming operations” means the operation of an authorized card gaming
55 facility.
56 “(9) “CFO” means the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia.
2

57 “(10) “Eligible establishment” means a business licensed by the Alcoholic
58 Beverage and Cannabis Board that holds an on-premises retailer’s license class C/H, D/H or
59 arena CX.
60 “(11) “MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.
61 “(12) “Office” means the Office of Lottery and Gaming.
62 “(13) “Operator” means a person who holds a card gaming facility operator
63 license.
64 “(14) “Person” means a natural person or entity.
65 “(15) “Poker gross gaming revenue” means the gross receipts generated from
66 poker, including any variations thereof, including rake, entry fees, commissions, and similar
67 amounts paid by players to participate in poker games.
68 “(16) “Supplier” means a person that:
69 “(A) Sells or leases, or contracts to sell or lease, card game equipment,
70 devices, systems, or supplies to an operator; or
71 “(B) Provides, or contracts to provide, security or surveillance services
72 required by the Office to an operator;
73 “(C) Provides management services to an operator.
74 “(17) “Voluntary exclusion program” means a program operated by the Office
75 that allows individuals to voluntarily exclude themselves from engaging in card gaming.
76 “Sec 502. Authorization of card gaming.
77 “(a) The operation of facilities where wagering on card games occurs, and the wagering
78 on card games at such facilities, shall be lawful in the District if conducted in accordance with
79 this title and the rules issued pursuant to this title.
3

80 “(b) This title does not authorize wagering:
81 “(1) On a card game that is played virtually or online;
82 “(2) On a card game where the outcome is determined by an electronic or other
83 device;
84 “(3) By a person other than a person playing the card game on which the wager is
85 placed.
86 “Sec. 503. Card gaming locations.
87 “(a) Card gaming shall be permitted under this title only at locations authorized by the
88 Office to be operated as card gaming facilities.
89 “(b) The Office shall authorize card gaming facilities to be operated only at eligible
90 establishments.
91 “(c) Card gaming facilities shall be authorized to be operated only as part of an operator’s
92 license issued under this title.
93 “(d) The Office shall, by rule, establish a limit on the number of card gaming facilities
94 that may be authorized to be operated in the District. In determining this limit, the Office shall
95 consider the sufficiency of the number of card gaming facilities to serve the public.
96 “Sec. 504. Operator’s license required; fee.
97 “(a) No person shall operate a card gaming facility unless the person holds an operator’s
98 license issued by the Office. An operator’s license shall authorize the licensee to operate card
99 gaming facilities only at such eligible establishments as shall be authorized on the license. An
100 operator shall not operate a card gaming facility at a location in the District other than an eligible
101 establishment authorized on its license.
102 “(b) To obtain an operator’s license a person shall:
4

103 “(1) Complete and submit to the Office an application for an operator’s license in
104 the manner and form prescribed by the Office;
105 “(2) Submit any information and documents requested by the Office as part of the
106 licensing process;
107 “(3) Satisfactorily pass a background investigation, which may include the
108 investigation of owners, officers, directors and employees of the applicant;
109 “(4) Satisfactorily pass an onsite inspection of the location or locations where the
110 applicant proposes to conduct card gaming operations;
111 “(5) Meet such other standards as the Office may establish by rule; and
112 “(6) Pay a nonrefundable application fee of $5,000, plus $2,000 for each location
113 where the applicant proposes to conduct card gaming operations.
114 “(c) The term of an operator’s license shall be 2 years.
115 “(d) A licensee may renew an operator’s license by filing an application with the Office
116 and providing such information and documents as may be requested by the Office. The
117 application fee for the renewal of an operator’s license shall be $1,500 plus $500 for each
118 location where the licensee is currently licensed to operate a card gaming facility.
119 “(e) As part of a renewal application, a licensee may request authorization to conduct
120 card gaming operations at additional locations. The applicant shall pay an additional application
121 fee of $1,000 for each new location requested.
122 “(f) An operator’s license shall not be transferable to another person, unless approved by
123 the Office in accordance with rules issued by the Office.
124 “(g) A person convicted of a disqualifying offense shall not be licensed as an operator by
125 the Office. The Office shall define disqualifying offense by a rule issued pursuant to this title.
5

126 “(h) No employee of the Office or ABCA or member of the ABC Board, or immediate
127 family member of an employee of the Office or ABCA or member of the ABC Board, may be an
128 applicant for, have an interest in, or obtain an operator’s license.”.
129 “(i) A person who has been denied an application for an operator’s license pursuant to
130 this section or rules issued pursuant this title shall have a right to a hearing before the Office and,
131 in the event of its affirmation of the denial, the right to appeal the decision of the Office to the
132 Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
133 “(j) Before issuing, renewing, or authorizing the transfer a license, the Office shall
134 determine that the applicant is not disqualified because of a conflicting interest in another license
135 or a supplier permit. The Office shall define conflicting interest and the standards for
136 disqualification by rules issued pursuant to this title.
137 “Sec. 505. Designated areas for card gaming operations within authorized establishments.
138 “(a) Each licensee shall locate its card gaming operations within the premises of an
139 authorized establishment only in specific areas approved by ABCA and the Office.
140 “(b) Each licensee shall post a warning sign clearly visible at each point of entry to the
141 designated areas where card gaming is located in an authorized establishment. The warning sign
142 shall include:
143 “(1) The minimum age required to participate in card gaming;
144 “(2) The contact information for the District’s gambling hotline;
145 “(3) Information on the voluntary exclusion program; and
146 “(4) The contact information for the Office for purposes of filing a licensee or
147 card gaming facility.
148 “Sec. 506. Card gaming by minors prohibited.
6

149 “(a) Neither a licensee nor an authorized establishment shall permit a person under the
150 age of 18 to participate in card gaming.
151 “(b) The Office may suspend or revoke a license and issue a fine, in accordance with
152 section 512, against a licensee that knowingly allows a person under the age of 18 to participate
153 in card gaming.
154 “Sec. 507. Voluntary exclusion program.
155 “Each licensee shall participate in the voluntary exclusion program operated by the
156 Office.
157 “Sec. 508. Taxation of card gaming.
158 “(a) A tax is imposed on all operators licensed by the Office for the operation of a card
159 gaming facility.
160 “(b) The rate of tax shall be 25% of the poker gross gaming revenue and 25% of the
161 blackjack gross gaming revenue from each card gaming facility the operator is authorized to
162 operate.
163 “(c) On or before the 20th calendar day of each month, each operator shall file a return
164 with the CFO, on forms and in the manner prescribed by the CFO, indicating the amount of
165 poker gross gaming revenue and blackjack gross gaming revenue from the operator’s authorized
166 card gaming facilities for the preceding calendar month and the amount of tax for which the
167 operator is liable, and shall make payment to the District of the amount for which the operator is
168 liable.
169 “(d) Of the total amount of tax revenue collected by the District under this section in each
170 fiscal year:
7

171 “(1) The first $250,000 shall be deposited in the Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming
172 Fund established by section 4; and
173 “(2) The remaining amount shall be deposited in the General Fund of the District
174 of Columbia.
175 “(e) All funds owed to the District under this section shall be held in trust for the District
176 in a federally insured depository institution that maintains an office in the District until the funds
177 are paid to the District.
178 “(f) Each operator shall keep a record of the poker gross gaming revenue and blackjack
179 gross gaming revenue in such form as the CFO may require.
180 “(g) An operator who fails to pay the tax imposed by this section shall be subject to all
181 collection, enforcement, and administrative provisions applicable to unpaid taxes or fees, as
182 provided in Chapters 41, 42, 43, and 44 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code.
183 “(h) Notwithstanding section 47-4406 of the District of Columbia Official Code, the CFO
184 may disclose the total amount of poker gross gaming revenue and blackjack gross gaming
185 revenue collected in the periodic estimates and reports of revenues.
186 “Sec. 509. Rules governing card gaming.
187 “(a) The CFO, pursuant to title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
188 Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall adopt
189 rules governing the conditions under which card gaming shall be conducted in the District and
190 such other rules it deems appropriate to implement or further the purposes of this title.
191 “(b) The rules issued by the CFO pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall include:
192 “(1) Minimum internal control standards, including:
8

193 “(A) Financial controls, including rules regarding the proper handling of
194 cash, accounting procedures, and auditing requirements;
195 “(B) Security and surveillance requirements, including rules regarding the
196 monitoring of gaming areas, protecting against theft and cheating, surveillance camera standards,
197 and recording and monitoring requirements;
198 “(C) Game integrity standards designed to ensure fair play, accurate
199 payouts, and compliance with card game rules;
200 “(D) Employee-related standards and requirements, including
201 occupational licensing, background checks, training, and ethical conduct requirements; and
202 “(E) Information technology and data security standards and requirements
203 designed to protect player information and ensure system integrity.
204 “(2) Minimum and maximum wager amounts;
205 “(3) The method of accounting to be used by operators;
206 “(4) Requirements and methods of age verification;
207 “(5) Requirements regarding records required to be maintained by an operator;
208 “(6) Advertising guidelines, including specific language concerning individuals
209 under the age of 18; and
210 “(7) Penalties for a violation of this title or rule issued pursuant to this title.”.
211 “Sec. 510. Supplier permit.
212 “(a) No person shall operate as a supplier unless the person holds a supplier permit issued
213 by the Office.
214 “(b) The Office shall establish by rule the requirements and standards for issuance of a
215 supplier permit and may establish a fee for the application for and issuance of a supplier permit.
9

216 “(c) No employee of the Office or ABCA or member of the ABC Board, or immediate
217 family member of an employee of the Office or ABCA or member of the ABC Board, may be an
218 applicant for, have an interest in, or obtain a supplier’s permit.”.
219 “Sec. 511. Occupational license.
220 “(a) All persons employed to be engaged in activities related to poker and blackjack shall
221 be required to be licensed by the Office and, when employed, shall maintain a valid occupational
222 license and be employed in the capacity reported to the Office.
223 “(b)(1) An applicant for an occupational license under this section shall submit an
224 application, in such form and format as shall be required by the Office, and pay a nonrefundable
225 fee of $100, which may be paid on behalf of the applicant by a prospective employer.
226 “(2) An applicant for an occupational license under this section shall be subject to
227 a background investigation by the Office to determine suitability.
228 “(3) The term of an occupational license under this section shall be 2 years from
229 the date of issuance by the Office.
230 “(4) To renew a license issued under this section, the holder of an occupational
231 license issued pursuant to this section shall, at least 30 days before the expiration of their license,
232 file a renewal application with the Office and pay a renewal fee of $100, which may be paid on
233 behalf of the licensed employee by the holder’s employer.
234 “Sec. 512. Penalties.
235 “(a) For a violation of this title or a rule issued pursuant to this title, the Office may take
236 one or more of the following actions:
237 “(1) Impose a fine of not more than $50,000;
238 “(2) Revoke an operator’s license or a supplier’s permit; or
10

239 “(3) Suspend an operator’s license or supplier’s permit.
240 “(b) A person who has been fined or whose license has been revoked or suspended
241 pursuant to this section shall have a right to a hearing before the Office and, in the event of its
242 affirmation of the fine, revocation or suspension, whichever applies, the right to appeal the
243 decision of the Office to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
244 “Sec. 513. Audits, investigations, and inspections.
245 “(a) The Office may conduct audits, investigations, searches, seizures, and other
246 investigatory and inspection activities appropriate to the implementation and enforcement of this
247 title and the rules issued pursuant to this title.
248 “(b) Each applicant for a license, each licensee, each authorized establishment and each
249 eligible establishment that is seeking to become an authorized establishment shall allow an
250 authorized member of the Office, an ABCA investigator, or any member of the MPD full
251 opportunity to examine at any time during business hours:
252 “(1) The area of the authorized establishment or eligible establishment where card
253 gaming operations are conducted or are requested to be authorized to be conducted; and
254 “(2) The books and records of the applicant, licensee, authorized establishment, or
255 eligible establishment, including video and audio recordings, wherever stored.
256 “Sec. 514. Other enforcement authority; seizures.
257 “(a) The Office, ABCA, or MPD may request and check the identification of a person
258 who has played, is playing, or is attempting to play a card game. The Office or MPD may seize
259 evidence that substantiates a violation under this title, which may include seizing the cash awards
260 issued to a person under the age of 18 and fake identification documents used by a person under
261 the age of 18.
11

262 “(b) The Office or MPD may seize card gaming equipment, devices, systems, or supplies
263 from a business if:
264 “(1) A card gaming facility is not authorized to be operated in the business;
265 “(2) The license of the operator allowing the operator to operate a card gaming
266 facility at the business has been suspended, revoked, or canceled by the Office;
267 “(3) The business is no longer in existence; or
268 “(4) The business has been closed by another District government agency.
269 “Sec. 515. Action by the Attorney General
270 The Attorney General for the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of
271 Columbia, may bring an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin a
272 person from violating this title or a rule issued pursuant to this title or to seek a civil penalty of
273 up to $50,000 for a violation of this title or a rule issued pursuant to this title.
274 “Sec. 516. Other powers and duties of the Office.
275 “In addition to the other authorities of the Office under this title, the Office shall have the
276 power to:
277 “(a) Oversee all card gaming operations authorized under this title, including all persons
278 conducting or participating in any card gaming operation;
279 “(b) Employ or contract for such persons to be present during card gaming operations as
280 are necessary to ensure that such gaming operations are conducted in an orderly fashion and the
281 highest degree of integrity; and
282 “(c) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses before the Office, administer oaths,
283 and compel production of records or other documents and testimony of such witnesses whenever
12

284 in the judgment of the Office it is necessary to do so for the effectual discharge of its duties
285 under this title.”.
286 Sec. 3. Title 25 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
287 (a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
288 (1) The section designation “§ 25-786. Game of skill machine operating
289 requirements.” is repealed.
290 (2) A new subchapter and section designations are added to read as follows:
291 “Subchapter IX-A. Games of skill and card gaming.
292 “§ 25-788. Game of skill machine operating requirements.
293 “§ 25-789. Card gaming operating requirements.”.
294 (b) Chapter 1 is amended as follows:
295 (1) Section 25-101 is amended by adding a new paragraph (13A) to read as
296 follows:
297 “(13A) “Card gaming” has the meaning set forth in section 501(6) of the Law to
298 Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the
299 District of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-172; D.C. Official Code passim).”.
300 (2) Section 25-113.01 is amended by adding a new subsection (i) to read as
301 follows:
302 “(i)(1) A licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license class C/H, D/H, multipurpose
303 facility class CX or DX, or arena CX, shall, in order for a portion of the premises of the licensed
304 establishment to be operated as a card gaming facility:
305 “(A) Obtain a card gaming endorsement from the Board; and
13

306 “(B) Be listed as an authorized card gaming facility on a card operator’s
307 license issued by the Office of Lottery and Gaming pursuant to title V of the Law to Legalize
308 Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the District
309 of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-172; D.C. Official Code passim).
310 “(2)(A) Card gaming shall not be allowed on outdoor public or private space;
311 except, that the Board, in its discretion, may allow for card gaming on outdoor public or private
312 space if, in the Board’s determination, activity associated with the card gaming is:
313 “(i) Not visible from a public street or sidewalk;
314 “(ii) Adequately secured against unauthorized entrance; and
315 “(iii) Accessible only by patrons from within the establishment.
316 “(B) Subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply to a licensee
317 operating a passenger-carrying marine vessel in accordance with § 25-113(h).”.
318 (c) The tabular array in section 25-508 of Chapter 5 is amended by adding the following
319 row at the end:
320 “Card gaming endorsement $500/year”.
321 (d) Chapter 7 is amended as follows:
322 (1) Section 25-762 is amended by adding a new subsection (d) to read as follows:
323 “(d)(1) A card gaming endorsement, other than a card gaming endorsement described in
324 paragraph (2) of this subsection, shall constitute a substantial change under this section.
325 “(2) A card gaming endorsement shall not constitute a substantial change under
326 this section if applied for by an arena CX license holder or by a licensee whose establishment is
327 located in the Capitol Gateway (CG), Downtown (D), Northern Howard Road (NHR), or
14

328 Southeast Federal Center (SEFC) zone as described in Title 11 of the District of Columbia
329 Municipal Regulations.”.
330 (1) Section 25-763(g) is amended by striking the phrase “game of skill machines”
331 and inserting the phrase “game of skill machines or card gaming” in its place.
332 (2) Section 25-765(c) is amended by striking the phrase “game of skill machines”
333 and inserting the phrase “game of skill machines or card gaming” in its place.
334 (3) Section 25-786 is repealed.
335 (e) Section 25-801 is amended by adding a new subsection (i) to read as follows:
336 “(i) An ABCA investigator may request and check the identification of a person who has
337 participated in, is participating in, or is attempting to participate in card gaming. An ABCA
338 investigator may seize fake identification used by a person under 18 years of age and may seize
339 such records related to card gaming operations as the investigator considers appropriate to
340 investigate the participation in card gaming by a person under 18 years of age.”.
341 (e) A new subchapter IX-A is added to read as follows:
342 “Subchapter IX-A. Game of skill machines and card gaming.
343 “§ 25-788. Game of skill machine operating requirements.
344 “A licensee with a game of skill machine endorsement shall:
345 “(1) Not allow or permit a person under 18 years of age to play a game of skill
346 machine and shall designate an employee to regularly monitor the designated area where game of
347 skill machines are played to ensure that no person under 18 years of age is playing or attempting
348 to play a game of skill machine;
349 “(2) Verify that each person playing a game of skill machine is lawfully permitted
350 to do so by checking the person’s government-issued identification document upon entry into
15

351 either the licensed establishment or the designated area where the game of skill machines are
352 located and where the person seeks to cash out his or her winnings, if any; except, that the failure
353 of a licensee to verify a person’s identification shall not be a violation of this paragraph if the
354 person whose identification was not checked is 18 years of age or older;
355 “(3) Not allow or permit a person that appears intoxicated or under the influence
356 of a narcotic or other substance to play a game of skill machine;
357 “(4) Not share revenue from the licensee’s sale of alcohol with a manufacturer or
358 distributor of a game of skill machine, unless approved by the Board as an owner of the license;
359 “(5) Not allow or permit the placement of a game of skill machine on an outdoor
360 public or private space that has not been approved by the Board;
361 “(6) Not allow or permit the placement of a game of skill machine outside of the
362 designated areas contained on the applicant’s diagram provided as part of the license application
363 or outside the areas approved by the Board;
364 “(7) Not have more than 5 game of skill machines on the licensed premises; and
365 “(8) Install security cameras that are operational and record for 30 days, in the
366 areas designated for game of skill machines, near the cash register or terminal where cash
367 winnings of game of skill machines are processed, and where the licensee’s money is stored.
368 “§ 25-789. Card gaming operating requirements.
369 “A licensee with a card gaming endorsement shall:
370 “(1) Not allow or permit a person under 18 years of age to participate in card
371 gaming and shall designate an employee to be present in the designated area at all times where
372 card gaming is located when card gaming is occurring to ensure that no person under 18 years of
373 age is participating or attempting to participate in card gaming;
16

374 “(2) Verify that each person participating in card gaming is lawfully permitted to
375 do so by checking the person’s government-issued identification document upon entry into either
376 the licensed establishment or the designated area where card gaming is located and where the
377 person seeks to cash out his or her winnings, if any; except, that the failure of a licensee to verify
378 a person’s identification shall not be a violation of this paragraph if the person whose
379 identification was not checked is 18 years of age or older;
380 “(3) Not allow or permit a person that appears intoxicated or under the influence
381 of a narcotic or other substance to participate in card gaming;
382 “(4) Not share revenue from the licensee’s sale of alcohol with a card gaming
383 operator, unless approved by the Board as an owner of the license;
384 “(5) Not allow or permit card gaming outside of the areas approved by the Board;
385 “(6) Install security cameras that are operational and record for 30 days, in the
386 areas designated for card gaming, near the cash register or terminal where cash winnings of card
387 gaming are processed, and where the licensee’s money is stored.
388 Sec. 4. Section 16-1702 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding
389 a new subsection (e) to read as follows:
390 “(e) This section shall not apply to card gaming authorized by Title V of the Law to
391 Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the
392 District of Columbia, as introduced on April __, 2025 (Bill 26-___).”.
393 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
394 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
395 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
396 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
17

397 Sec. 6. Effective date.
398 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
399 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
400 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
401 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813, D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
402 Columbia Register.
18

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Ryan Nicholas
Legislative Director
Office of the Deputy Director for Economic Planning & Development
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 26, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation, the “Poker and Blackjack Gaming
Authorization Act of 2025”
(AE-25-54)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 30, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Poker and Blackjack Gaming Authorization
Act of 2025
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September
29, 2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
The bill legalizes poker and blackjack card games, including any authorized variations thereof, and
requires the Office of Lottery and Gaming (OLG) to regulate card gaming in the District.
Establishments holding certain types of retailers’ licenses issued by the Alcoholic Beverage and
Cannabis Administration (ABCA)1 that obtain a license and are authorized by OLG are eligible
establishments where card games may be wagered on. To obtain a two-year license, operators must
submit to OLG an application with supporting documentation, pass a background check, receive an
onsite inspection, and pay an application fee of $5,000 plus $2,000 per card gaming location.
Licensees can renew their licenses for $1,500 plus $500 for each location. Licensees can request
additional locations during the renewal process by paying an additional $1,000 fee for each new
location. Card game suppliers must also be granted a permit by OLG to operate in the District. The
bill also requires any employee engaged in poker or blackjack to obtain and maintain an occupational
license from OLG.
1 The bill defines eligible establishments as those that hold an on-premises class C/H, D/H, or arena CX
retailer’s license issued by the Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Board.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Poker and Blackjack Gaming Authorization Act of 2025,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on September 29, 2025
The bill ensures that virtual and online events with outcomes generated by an electronic device are
not authorized under the bill.
The bill establishes a 25 percent tax on all gross gaming revenue collected through poker and
blackjack. Operators must file a monthly return to the Chief Financial Officer (CFO) indicating the
amount of revenue collected for the prior month. The bill dedicates the first $250,000 of related tax
revenues to the Lottery, Gambling, and Gaming Fund (Fund),2 while the remaining revenues are
directed to the District’s General Fund.
The CFO will establish rules governing card gaming, including internal control standards, financial
controls, security and surveillance requirements, game integrity, employee-related standards,
information technology standards, minimum and maximum wager amounts, and age verification
standards. The bill requires operators to adhere to certain operating procedures and prohibits
persons under the age of 18 from participating in card gaming. The bill allows OLG to issue fines and
penalties to card game operators who violate the card gaming laws or rules. OLG may conduct audits,
investigations, searches, seizures, and other investigatory and inspection activities appropriate to
the implementation and enforcement of card gaming. The Office of the Attorney General may also
bring an action in Superior Court against a person violating card gaming laws or rules.
Eligible establishments must obtain an ABCA endorsement to operate a card gaming facility. The bill
establishes that ABCA should not consider an application for an endorsement to be a substantial
change3 to an eligible establishment’s ABCA license if the licensee holds an arena CX license or is
located in a Capital Gateway, Downtown, Northern Howard Road, or Southeast Federal Center zone.4
A card gaming endorsement will cost $500 per year. An establishment with a card gaming
endorsement must have an employee in the card gaming area at all times while gaming is occurring,
to ensure no person under the age of eighteen is participating or attempting to participate.
The bill also updates the statutory operating requirements for game of skill machines in licensed
establishments. The bill requires an employee to regularly monitor a game of skill machine, such as
ensuring no person under the age of eighteen5 or intoxicated plays a machine, machines are only in
designated areas, and no establishment has more than five machines.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. There is no information available to estimate the number of potential card gaming
sites, but if an eligible establishment wants to host these activities, it must obtain the proper
authorizations from OLG and ABCA. No additional revenue is estimated as a result of the bill due to
the uncertainty around the number of establishments and how card gaming activity will displace
other existing taxable sales. If tax revenues are received, the bill designates the first $250,000 of the
tax revenues to the Fund. OLG will absorb the cost of any initial licensing activities. If activity becomes
2 Law to Legalize Lotteries, Daily Numbers Games, and Bingo and Raffles for Charitable Purposes in the
District of Columbia, effective March 10, 1981 (D.C. Law 3-172; D.C. Official Code § 36-601.12).
3 Title 25, D.C. Code Enactment and Related Amendments Act of 2001, effective May 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-298;
D.C. Official Code § 25-762).
4 As defined in Zoning Regulations of 2016 (11 DCMR §§ 11-I & 11-K).
5 GOS Machine License Requirements, effective March 26, 2021 (33 DCMR § 2205 et seq.).
Page 2 of 3

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Poker and Blackjack Gaming Authorization Act of 2025,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on September 29, 2025
more significant, OLG will use the tax revenue directed toward the Fund to hire additional regulatory
staff.
Page 3 of 3